Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.522

Seattle Mariners license plates.

"Seattle Mariners license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork recognizing the Seattle Mariners.

[ 2018 c 67 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 67 ss 3-8: See note following RCW 43.388.040.